Georgia statutes. TITLE 52 Waters of the State, Ports, and Watercraft
Article 1 Board of Pilotage Commissioners

52-6-1.
Composition of board; terms of commissioners.

The corporate authorities of Savannah, Darien, Brunswick, and St. Marys shall each have power to appoint a Board of Pilotage Commissioners (hereinafter referred to as the commissioners), consisting of seven commissioners, each appointed for a term of seven years. Terms of the commissioners shall be staggered with one term expiring each year.

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 33; Code 1863, § 1453; Code 1868, § 1510; Code 1873, § 1504; Code 1882, § 1504; Ga. L. 1894, p. 41, §§ 1, 2; Civil Code 1895, § 1651; Civil Code 1910, § 1897; Code 1933, § 80-101; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 52.

52-6-2.
Filling of vacancies on board.

Vacancies occurring for any reason before the expiration of a term shall be filled by appointment by the corporate authorities for the unexpired term.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 41, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 1652; Civil Code 1910, § 1898; Ga. L. 1914, p. 57, § 1; Code 1933, § 80-102; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 2.

52-6-3.
Qualifications of commissioners.

Only ship agents, exporters, merchants, or other persons who are not pilots and who are engaged in or are familiar with marine shipping and with the requirements of their respective ports shall be appointed commissioners of pilotage.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 41, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 1652; Civil Code 1910, § 1898; Ga. L. 1914, p. 57, § 1; Code 1933, § 80-102; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 2.

52-6-4.
Areas for which commissioners appointed.

The commissioners to be appointed by the corporate authorities of Savannah shall be appointed for the Tybee Bar and the Savannah River and the several bars and inlets north of Sapelo Bar. Commissioners to be appointed by the corporate authorities of Darien shall be appointed for Sapelo Bar and the Altamaha River and the several bars and inlets south of Sapelo Bar as far as St. Simon’s Bar. Commissioners to be appointed by the corporate authorities of Brunswick shall be appointed for St. Simon’s Bar, Turtle River, St. Andrew’s Bar, and the several bars and inlets north of and including the Great Satilla River. Commissioners to be appointed by the corporate authorities of St. Marys shall be appointed for St. Marys Bar and all bars and inlets between St. Marys Bar and St. Andrew’s Bar.

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 33; Code 1863, § 1453; Code 1868, § 1510; Code 1873, § 1504; Code 1882, § 1504; Ga. L. 1894, p. 41, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 1651; Civil Code 1910, § 1897; Code 1933, § 80-101; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 3; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 52.

52-6-5.
Appointment of master pilot; duties of master pilot generally.

The commissioners of pilotage may appoint one of the active pilots to be the master pilot, to have charge of the pilots, and, as representative of the commissioners, to see that its rules and regulations are complied with.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 7.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Pilot and apprentice age limitations, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Board of Pilotage Commissioners, Saint Simons and Saint Andrews Bars, Government of Bar and Harbor Pilotage, Sec. 494-1-1-.08.

52-6-6.
Right of commissioners to bring an action to recover forfeitures.

The commissioners are authorized, in their own names or in that of their chairman as such, to bring an action for and recover, to their own use and the improvement of navigation, any forfeiture accruing under this chapter which is not otherwise specifically appropriated.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1490; Code 1868, § 1547; Code 1873, § 1541; Code 1882, § 1541; Civil Code 1895, § 1689; Civil Code 1910, § 1935; Code 1933, § 80-209; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 27; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 52.

52-6-7.
Manner of application of fines and forfeitures.

All fines and forfeitures collected by the commissioners, or so much thereof as may be necessary, shall be applied toward the payment of the expenses of the board.

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 37; Code 1863, § 1483; Code 1868, § 1540; Code 1873, § 1534; Code 1882, § 1534; Civil Code 1895, § 1682; Civil Code 1910, § 1928; Code 1933, § 80-208; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 25.

52-6-8.
Keeping of records by board; designation of chairperson of board; keeping list of pilots whose licenses have been revoked; access of public to records.

The commissioners shall preserve in a neatly bound book a record of all their acts and of all the rules and regulations adopted by them for the direction and government of pilots. The commissioners shall designate one of their number as chairperson and cause a record thereof to be made. The commissioners shall also preserve upon their records a list of the names of all persons appointed pilots by them, as well as a list of the names of those whose licenses have been suspended or revoked or who have been retired. All persons interested shall have access to and be permitted to have duplicates of such records.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, §§ 1473, 1474; Code 1868, §§ 1530, 1531; Code 1873, §§ 1524, 1525; Code 1882, §§ 1524, 1525; Civil Code 1895, §§ 1672, 1673; Civil Code 1910, §§ 1918, 1919; Code 1933, §§ 80-112, 80-113; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, §§ 22, 23; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 96/HB 24.

Cross references.

Inspection of public records generally, §

50-18-70

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Law reviews.

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).

52-6-9.
Salary or fees of secretary.

The secretary of the commissioners shall have such salary or fees as the commissioners may determine, which salary or fees shall be paid out of fines and forfeitures or such other fund as shall be under the control of the commissioners.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1474; Code 1868, § 1531; Code 1873, § 1525; Code 1882, § 1525; Civil Code 1895, § 1673; Civil Code 1910, § 1919; Code 1933, § 80-113; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 23.

52-6-10.
Determination of location of office of commissioners; location of books, papers, and records of commissioners.

The office of the commissioners must be kept in some suitable place of which the public shall have notice; and their books, papers, and records may be kept in such office or in the office of any court of record in the county.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1475; Code 1868, § 1532; Code 1873, § 1526; Code 1882, § 1526; Civil Code 1895, § 1674; Civil Code 1910, § 1920; Code 1933, § 80-103; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 24.

52-6-11.
Rules and regulations; reciprocal pilotage in port of St. Marys and tributaries of St. Marys River.

The commissioners shall prescribe rules and regulations for the government of pilots and the fees which may be charged for their services and shall, from time to time, revise and grade pilotage fees when, in their judgment, it is necessary to do so. All rules and regulations consistent with this chapter existing as of January 1, 1995, and all fees prescribed by the commissioners as of January 1, 1995, shall remain in effect until changed as provided in this chapter.

The Board of Pilotage Commissioners for the City of St. Marys, having jurisdiction over areas which include boundary waters, shall be separately empowered to agree, in form, with the Florida State Board of Pilot Commissioners to establish authority for reciprocal pilotage in the port of St. Marys and the tributaries of the St. Marys River.

History.

Ga. L. 1886, p. 38, § 3; Civil Code 1895, § 1655; Ga. L. 1901, p. 31, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 1901; Ga. L. 1915, p. 16, § 1; Code 1933, § 80-111; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 8; Ga. L. 1989, p. 451, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 846, § 1.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Pilot and apprentice age limitations, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Board of Pilotage Commissioners, Saint Simons and Saint Andrews Bar, Government of Bar and Harbor Pilotage, Sec. 494-1-1-.08.